lt-LT: Žaislinio mikrofono funkcijų rinkinys: Reguliuojamas garsumas; Automatinis išsijungimas; „Bluetooth“ garsiakalbio režimas; Integruotas garsiakalbis; Du mikrofonai (pora); Aido efektas; Grįžtamojo ryšio mažinimas; Pridedami karaokės / muzikos takeliai; LED apšvietimas; Aukščio valdymas; Atkūrimas; Įrašymas; Nuimama galvutė; Reverberacijos efektas; Garso efektai (mygtukai); Stovas pridedamas; Balso stiprinimas; Balso keitiklis; Belaidis mikrofonas; Kita
sl-SI: Komplet funkcij igrače z mikrofonom: Prilagodljiva glasnost; Samodejni izklop; Način zvočnika Bluetooth; Vgrajen zvočnik; Dvojna mikrofona (par); Učinek odmeva; Zmanjšanje mikrofonije; Vključene karaoke/glasbene skladbe; LED lučke; Nadzor višine tona; Predvajanje; Snemanje; Odstranljiva glava; Učinek reverberacije; Zvočni učinki (gumbi); Vključeno stojalo; Ojačanje glasu; Sprememba glasu; Brezžični mikrofon; Drugo
pt-BR: Microfone de brinquedo conjunto de recursos: Volume ajustável; Desligamento automático; Modo de alto-falante Bluetooth; Alto-falante embutido; Microfones duplos (par); Efeito de eco; Redução de feedback; Faixas de karaokê/música incluídas; Luzes de LED; Controle de afinação; Reprodução; Gravação; Cabeça removível; Efeito de reverberação; Efeitos sonoros (botões); Suporte incluído; Amplificação de voz; Modificador de voz; Microfone sem fio; Outro
tr: Oyuncak mikrofon özellik seti: Ayarlanabilir ses; Otomatik kapanma; Bluetooth hoparlör modu; Dahili hoparlör; Çift mikrofon (çift); Yankı efekti; Geri bildirim azaltma; Karaoke/müzik parçaları dahil; LED ışıklar; Ton kontrolü; Oynatma; Kayıt; Çıkarılabilir başlık; Reverb efekti; Ses efektleri (düğmeler); Stant dahil; Ses yükseltme; Ses değiştirici; Kablosuz mikrofon; Diğer
fr: Fonctions du microphone jouet: Volume réglable; Arrêt automatique; Mode enceinte Bluetooth; Haut-parleur intégré; Deux microphones (paire); Effet d’écho; Réduction de l’effet Larsen; Pistes karaoké/musicales incluses; Lumières LED; Contrôle de la hauteur; Lecture; Enregistrement; Tête amovible; Effet de réverbération; Effets sonores (boutons); Pied inclus; Amplification de la voix; Modificateur de voix; Microphone sans fil; Autre
cs: Sada funkcí hračky s mikrofonem: Nastavitelná hlasitost; Automatické vypnutí; Režim reproduktoru Bluetooth; Integrovaný reproduktor; Dva mikrofony (pár); Efekt ozvěny; Redukce zpětné vazby; Včetně karaoke / hudebních skladeb; LED světla; Ovládání výšky tónu; Přehrávání; Nahrávání; Odnímatelná hlavice; Efekt reverbu; Zvukové efekty (tlačítka); Včetně stojanu; Zesílení hlasu; Měnič hlasu; Bezdrátový mikrofon; Jiné
hu: Játékmikrofon funkciókészlete: Állítható hangerő; Automatikus kikapcsolás; Bluetooth hangszóró mód; Beépített hangszóró; Két mikrofon (pár); Visszhang effektus; Visszacsatolás-csökkentés; Karaoke/zenei sávok mellékelve; LED-világítás; Hangmagasság-szabályozás; Lejátszás; Felvétel; Levehető fej; Zengető effekt; Hangeffektusok (gombok); Állvánnyal; Hangerősítés; Hangtorzító; Vezeték nélküli mikrofon; Egyéb
sk-SK: Funkcie súpravy hračkárskeho mikrofónu: Nastaviteľná hlasitosť; Automatické vypnutie; Režim Bluetooth reproduktora; Vstavaný reproduktor; Dvojité mikrofóny (pár); Efekt ozveny; Redukcia spätnej väzby; Vrátane karaoke/hudobných skladieb; LED svetlá; Ovládanie výšky tónu; Prehrávanie; Nahrávanie; Odnímateľná hlava; Efekt dozvuku; Zvukové efekty (tlačidlá); Stojan v balení; Zosilnenie hlasu; Menič hlasu; Bezdrôtový mikrofón; Iné
th: ชุดของเล่นไมโครโฟน: ปรับระดับเสียงได้; ปิดอัตโนมัติ; โหมดลำโพงบลูทูธ; ลำโพงในตัว; ไมโครโฟนคู่ (แบบคู่); เอฟเฟกต์เสียงสะท้อน; ลดเสียงหอน; รวมเพลงคาราโอเกะ/ดนตรี; ไฟ LED; ควบคุมระดับเสียงสูงต่ำ; การเล่นย้อนกลับ; การบันทึกเสียง; ถอดหัวได้; เอฟเฟกต์เสียงก้อง; เอฟเฟกต์เสียง (ปุ่มกด); รวมขาตั้ง; การขยายเสียง; เปลี่ยนเสียงพูด; ไมโครโฟนไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 麦克风玩具功能套装: 可调节音量; 自动关机; 蓝牙音箱模式; 内置扬声器; 双麦克风（一对）; 回声效果; 防啸叫; 含卡拉 OK/音乐曲目; LED 灯; 音调控制; 回放; 录音; 可拆卸麦克风头; 混响效果; 音效（按钮）; 含支架; 语音放大; 变声器; 无线麦克风; 其他
it: Funzionalità del microfono giocattolo: Volume regolabile; Spegnimento automatico; Modalità altoparlante Bluetooth; Altoparlante integrato; Doppio microfono (coppia); Effetto eco; Riduzione del feedback; Tracce karaoke/musicali incluse; Luci a LED; Controllo dell'intonazione; Riproduzione; Registrazione; Testa rimovibile; Effetto riverbero; Effetti sonori (pulsanti); Supporto incluso; Amplificazione vocale; Cambia voce; Microfono wireless; Altro
bg-BG: Комплект функции за играчка микрофон: Регулируема сила на звука; Автоматично изключване; Режим на Bluetooth високоговорител; Вграден високоговорител; Два микрофона (комплект); Ехо ефект; Намаляване на микрофонията; Включени караоке/музикални записи; LED светлини; Контрол на височината на тона; Възпроизвеждане; Записване; Подвижна глава; Реверберация; Звукови ефекти (бутони); Включена стойка; Усилване на гласа; Промяна на гласа; Безжичен микрофон; Друго
zh-TW: 玩具麥克風功能組合: 音量可調; 自動關機; 藍牙喇叭模式; 內建喇叭; 雙麥克風 (一對); 回音效果; 防回授; 內建卡拉 OK/音樂曲目; LED 燈; 音調控制; 播放; 錄音; 可拆式麥克風頭; 殘響效果; 音效 (按鈕); 含麥克風架; 人聲擴音; 變聲器; 無線麥克風; 其他
sv: Mikrofonleksakens funktioner: Justerbar volym; Automatisk avstängning; Bluetooth-högtalarläge; Inbyggd högtalare; Dubbla mikrofoner (par); Ekoeffekt; Återkopplingsreducering; Karaoke/musikspår ingår; LED-lampor; Tonhöjdskontroll; Uppspelning; Inspelning; Avtagbart huvud; Reverbeffekt; Ljudeffekter (knappar); Stativ ingår; Röstförstärkning; Röstförvrängare; Trådlös mikrofon; Annat
da: Funktionssæt for mikrofonlegetøj: Justerbar lydstyrke; Automatisk slukning; Bluetooth-højttalertilstand; Indbygget højttaler; Dobbelt mikrofon (par); Ekkoeffekt; Reduktion af feedback; Karaoke/musiknumre medfølger; LED-lys; Tonehøjdekontrol; Afspilning; Optagelse; Aftageligt hoved; Rumklangseffekt; Lydeffekter (knapper); Stativ medfølger; Stemmeforstærkning; Stemmeomformer; Trådløs mikrofon; Andet
pt-PT: Conjunto de brinquedos com microfone: Volume ajustável; Desligar automático; Modo altifalante Bluetooth; Altifalante integrado; Microfones duplos (par); Efeito de eco; Redução de feedback; Pistas de karaoke/música incluídas; Luzes LED; Controlo de tom; Reprodução; Gravação; Cabeça amovível; Efeito de reverberação; Efeitos sonoros (botões); Suporte incluído; Amplificação de voz; Modificador de voz; Microfone sem fios; Outro
ko: 장난감 마이크 기능 세트: 볼륨 조절; 자동 꺼짐; 블루투스 스피커 모드; 내장 스피커; 듀얼 마이크(페어); 에코 효과; 피드백 감소; 가라오케/음악 트랙 포함; LED 조명; 음정 조절; 재생; 녹음; 탈착식 헤드; 리버브 효과; 음향 효과(버튼); 스탠드 포함; 음성 증폭; 음성 변조; 무선 마이크; 기타
ru: Функциональные возможности игрушечного микрофона: Регулируемая громкость; Автоотключение; Режим Bluetooth-динамика; Встроенный динамик; Два микрофона (пара); Эффект эха; Подавление обратной связи; Караоке/музыкальные треки в комплекте; Светодиодная подсветка; Управление тоном; Воспроизведение; Запись; Съемная насадка; Эффект реверберации; Звуковые эффекты (кнопки); Стойка в комплекте; Усиление голоса; Изменение голоса; Беспроводной микрофон; Другое
en: Microphone toy feature set: Adjustable volume; Auto-off; Bluetooth speaker mode; Built-in speaker; Dual microphones (pair); Echo effect; Feedback reduction; Karaoke/music tracks included; LED lights; Pitch control; Playback; Recording; Removable head; Reverb effect; Sound effects (buttons); Stand included; Voice amplification; Voice changer; Wireless microphone; Other
pl: Zestaw funkcji mikrofonu zabawkowego: Regulacja głośności; Automatyczne wyłączanie; Tryb głośnika Bluetooth; Wbudowany głośnik; Dwa mikrofony (para); Efekt echa; Redukcja sprzężeń; Dołączone utwory karaoke/muzyczne; Światła LED; Kontrola tonu; Odtwarzanie; Nagrywanie; Zdejmowana głowica; Efekt pogłosu; Efekty dźwiękowe (przyciski); Statyw w zestawie; Wzmacnianie głosu; Zmieniacz głosu; Mikrofon bezprzewodowy; Inne
hr-HR: Komplet značajki igračke s mikrofonom: Prilagodljiva glasnoća; Automatsko isključivanje; Način rada Bluetooth zvučnika; Ugrađeni zvučnik; Dva mikrofona (par); Efekt jeke; Smanjenje mikrofonije; Uključene su karaoke / glazbene pjesme; LED svjetla; Kontrola visine tona; Reprodukcija; Snimanje; Odvojiva glava; Efekt odjeka; Zvučni efekti (gumbi); Uključen je stalak; Pojačavanje glasa; Uređaj za promjenu glasa; Bežični mikrofon; Ostalo
ro-RO: Set de caracteristici ale jucăriei microfon: Volum reglabil; Oprire automată; Mod boxă Bluetooth; Difuzor încorporat; Microfoane duale (pereche); Efect de ecou; Reducerea feedback-ului; Melodii de karaoke/muzică incluse; Lumini LED; Control al înălțimii sunetului; Redare; Înregistrare; Cap detașabil; Efect de reverb; Efecte sonore (butoane); Suport inclus; Amplificarea vocii; Modificator de voce; Microfon wireless; Altele
ja: マイクのおもちゃの機能セット: 音量調節可能; オートオフ; Bluetoothスピーカーモード; 内蔵スピーカー; デュアルマイク (ペア); エコーエフェクト; フィードバックリダクション; カラオケ/音楽トラック内蔵; LEDライト; ピッチコントロール; 再生; 録音; 取り外し可能ヘッド; リバーブエフェクト; 効果音 (ボタン); スタンド付属; 音声増幅; ボイスチェンジャー; ワイヤレスマイク; その他
fi: Mikrofonilelun ominaisuusvalikoima: Säädettävä äänenvoimakkuus; Automaattinen sammutus; Bluetooth-kaiutintila; Sisäänrakennettu kaiutin; Kaksi mikrofonia (pari); Kaikuefekti; Kierron esto; Karaoke-/musiikkikappaleita mukana; LED-valot; Äänenkorkeuden säätö; Toisto; Tallennus; Irrotettava pää; Jälkikaikuefekti; Äänitehosteet (painikkeet); Teline sisältyy; Äänenvahvistus; Äänenmuunnin; Langaton mikrofoni; Muu
de: Funktionsumfang des Spielzeugmikrofons: Einstellbare Lautstärke; Abschaltautomatik; Bluetooth-Lautsprechermodus; Integrierter Lautsprecher; Zwei Mikrofone (Paar); Echoeffekt; Rückkopplungsunterdrückung; Karaoke-/Musiktitel enthalten; LED-Lichter; Tonhöhenregelung; Wiedergabe; Aufnahmefunktion; Abnehmbarer Kopf; Reverb-Effekt; Soundeffekte (Tasten); Ständer im Lieferumfang enthalten; Sprachverstärkung; Stimmverzerrer; Kabelloses Mikrofon; Sonstiges
el: Σετ λειτουργίας παιχνιδιών μικροφώνου: Ρυθμιζόμενη ένταση ήχου; Αυτόματη απενεργοποίηση; Λειτουργία ηχείου Bluetooth; Ενσωματωμένο ηχείο; Διπλά μικρόφωνα (ζεύγος); Εφέ ηχούς; Μείωση μικροφωνισμού (feedback); Περιλαμβάνονται κομμάτια καραόκε/μουσικής; Φώτα LED; Έλεγχος τονικού ύψους; Αναπαραγωγή; Εγγραφή; Αφαιρούμενη κεφαλή; Εφέ αντήχησης; Ηχητικά εφέ (κουμπιά); Περιλαμβάνεται βάση; Ενίσχυση φωνής; Αλλαγή φωνής; Ασύρματο μικρόφωνο; Άλλο
es: Conjunto de características del micrófono de juguete: Volumen ajustable; Apagado automático; Modo de altavoz Bluetooth; Altavoz integrado; Micrófonos duales (par); Efecto de eco; Reducción de acoples; Pistas de karaoke/música incluidas; Luces LED; Control de tono; Reproducción; Grabación; Cabezal extraíble; Efecto de reverberación; Efectos de sonido (botones); Soporte incluido; Amplificación de voz; Modificador de voz; Micrófono inalámbrico; Otro
nl: Microfoonspeelgoed functieset: Aanpasbaar volume; Automatisch uitschakelen; Bluetooth-luidsprekermodus; Ingebouwde luidspreker; Twee microfoons (paar); Echo-effect; Feedbackreductie; Inclusief karaoke/muzieknummers; Ledverlichting; Toonhoogteregeling; Afspelen; Opnemen; Verwijderbare kop; Galmeffect; Geluidseffecten (knoppen); Inclusief standaard; Stemversterking; Stemvervormer; Draadloze microfoon; Overige
vi: Bộ đồ chơi micro với nhiều tính năng: Chỉnh âm lượng; Tự động tắt; Chế độ loa Bluetooth; Loa tích hợp; Micrô kép (cặp); Hiệu ứng tiếng vang; Giảm tiếng hú; Kèm bài hát/nhạc nền Karaoke; Đèn LED; Điều chỉnh cao độ; Phát lại; Ghi âm; Đầu mic tháo rời; Hiệu ứng âm vang (reverb); Nút hiệu ứng âm thanh; Kèm theo giá đỡ; Khuếch đại giọng nói; Thay đổi giọng nói; Micrô không dây; Khác
nb: Mikrofonleketøys-funksjonssett: Justerbart volum; Automatisk avslåing; Bluetooth-høyttalermodus; Innebygd høyttaler; Doble mikrofoner (par); Ekkoeffekt; Feedback-reduksjon; Karaoke-/musikkspor inkludert; LED-lys; Tonehøydekontroll; Avspilling; Opptak; Avtakbart hode; Romklangeffekt; Lydeffekter (knapper); Stativ inkludert; Stemmeforsterkning; Stemmevrenger; Trådløs mikrofon; Annet